Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-240.05
School lands; leases; rental; complaints.

The Board of Educational Lands and Funds shall sit twice each year to hear complaints from lessees as to the rental of their leases and may take such action as it may find to be right and proper in regard thereto.

Laws 1947, c. 235, § 7(6), p. 749;

Laws 1949, c. 212, § 12, p. 607;

Laws 1999, LB 779, § 34.